District of Columbia statutes.
1-125

Repealed

Statehood Commission.

Repealed.

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-171, § 6, 27 DCR 4732
Oct. 8, 1981, D.C. Law 4-35, § 2(e), 28 DCR 3376
Aug. 26, 1994, D.C. Law 10-167, § 2(a), 41 DCR 4895
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 2, 59 DCR 6190
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 101(a), 62 DCR 1884
1981 Ed., § 1-115.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 redesignated former (c-1) as (d).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 101(a) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, Nov. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 101(a) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).

Sources of funding appropriation: Section 101(d) of Pub. L. 99-591, the D.C. Appropriations Act, 1987, provided that the District of Columbia shall identify the sources of funding for admission to statehood from its own locally-generated revenues and provided further that no revenues from federal sources shall be used to support the operations or activities of the Statehood Commission and Statehood Compact Commission.

Section 1(c) of Pub. L. 100-202, the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1988, provided that the District of Columbia shall identify the sources of funding for Admission to Statehood from its own locally-generated revenues and provided further that no revenues from Federal sources shall be used to support the operations or activities of the Statehood Commission and Statehood Compact Commission.